Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0204.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1258. (1) By not later than July 31, 2026, the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall adopt and implement a policy that prescribes procedures the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy must follow before closing a school building. These procedures must address at least all of the following: (a) Reporting of data to the department as required by law. (b) Transition of students and the students' records, including academic and medical records, to new schools. (c) The selection of a records repository for the purposes of subsection (4) and the submission of student records to that repository. (d) Timely notification to the parents and legal guardians of students enrolled in the school and employees working at the school. These notification procedures must include at least a 1-month notice before a school is closed and at least 1 public meeting. For a public school academy that receives from its authorizing body a notice of revocation or nonrenewal of the public school academy's contract, these notification procedures also must include notice within 1 month after receipt of that notice of revocation or nonrenewal. For a school district or intermediate school district, the notification to parents and legal guardians also must include information regarding the reassignment of students to other schools operated by the school district or intermediate school district. For a public school academy, the notification to parents and legal guardians also must include information about options for placement in other public schools along with contact information and important timelines for enrollment in other public schools. A notification provided to parents and legal guardians under this subdivision must include information on where student records are being stored and how parents and legal guardians can access them. The notification procedures must provide for notifications described in this subdivision to be made by first-class mail unless that method of notice is not financially feasible, in which case an alternative method may be used such as electronic notice, sending notifications home with students, or contracting with a third party to provide notifications. (e) Distribution of assets and proper securement of the closed school building within 60 days after it is closed, if it is not anticipated to be leased or sold in a timely manner. The procedure for distribution of assets must include at least an accounting of the assets of the school building and a report to the board of the school district or intermediate school district or to the authorizing body of the public school academy, and to the department that inventories those assets including any obligated fund amounts. However, except as otherwise provided under this act, for a public school that has been incorporated under the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192, the procedure for distribution of assets must comply with that act with respect to distribution of assets. (f) That if a decision to close a school building is based on financial projections made during the normal budget development process for the school fiscal year beginning on the next July 1, the closure decision must be made and the notification procedures under subdivision (d) must be started not later than that next July 1. (g) That if a decision to close a school building is made for a reason other than finances, the closure decision must be made and the notification procedures under subdivision (d) must be started not later than the end of the school fiscal year, and that a closure during the next school year for a reason other than finances is prohibited unless this deadline is met. (h) That the closure of a school building during the school year is allowed only if there is an extenuating circumstance that would endanger the health or safety of the students in attendance at the school building. For a closure allowed under this subdivision, the notification procedures under subdivision (d) must be started as soon as possible after the discovery of the extenuating circumstance. (2) A policy adopted under subsection (1) must include language regarding the allocation of funds to employ an individual to facilitate the transition and ensure that all applicable requirements of the law are met. (3) By not later than March 31, 2026, the department shall develop and make available a model policy for the purposes of this section that complies with subsection (1). (4) A policy adopted under subsection (1) must include the selection of a records repository to provide long-term storage and maintenance of the records of students of the closed school building that are not delivered to new schools under subsection (1)(b). The intermediate school district in which the closed school building is located is the default records repository for those records unless the closed school building is a public school academy and the school district in which the closed school building is located or the public school academy's authorizing body agrees to act as the records repository for those records.